West Virginia, session 2026, HB4752.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Repeal of section pertaining to Entry upon or recovery of lands. That §55-2-1 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed.  NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal a provision of the code relating to the limitation on bringing an action to enter upon or recover lands.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home